District of Columbia statutes.
9-401.15

Unexpended allotments for street paving made available for succeeding year.

When as many streets and entire blocks of streets in any section have been paved as the amount allotted to that section will permit, and there still remains a balance insufficient to pave an entire block of the street provided for pavement upon the schedule, such balance shall remain available and be added to the allotment for that section for the next succeeding year.

June 6, 1900, 31 Stat. 559, ch. 789
1981 Ed., § 7-624.
1973 Ed., § 7-619.